Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2469
Duty of personal representative; supplementary inventory.

If any property not included in the original inventory comes to the knowledge of a personal representative or if the personal representative learns that the value or description indicated in the original inventory for any item is erroneous or misleading, the personal representative shall make a supplementary inventory or appraisement showing the market value as of the date of the decedent's death of the new item or the revised market value or descriptions and the appraisers or other data relied upon, if any, and file it with the court and furnish copies thereof or information thereof to persons interested in the new information.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 147, UPC § 3-708;

Laws 1997, LB 770, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 16.